Missouri, session 2026, SB1564.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 407.652 and 407.653,
to read as follows:
407.652. As used in this section and section 407.653,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Authorized repair provider", an individual or
business that has an oral or written arrangement for a
definite or indefinite period in which a manufacturer or
distributor transfers to a separate business organization or
individual license to use a trade name, service mark, or
relative characteristic for the purposes of offering repair
services under the name of the manufacturer;
(2) "Documentation", manuals, diagrams, reporting
output, schematic diagrams, or service code descriptions
provided to the authorized repair provider for the purposes
of repair or refurbishment;
(3) "Embedded software", programmable instructions
provided on firmware delivered with certain products for the
purposes of product operation, including all relevant
safety, security, and defect patches and fixes made by the

SB 1564 2
manufacturer for this purpose. "Embedded software" shall
include all software that satisfies this definition
regardless if called a different name including, but not
limited to, assembly code, basic internal operating system,
internal operating system, machine code, microcode, or root
code;
(4) "Fair and reasonable terms", an equitable price in
light of relevant factors including, but not limited to:
(a) The net cost to the authorized repair provider for
similar parts obtained from manufacturers less any
discounts, rebates, or other incentive programs;
(b) The cost to the manufacturer for preparing and
distributing the parts or product, excluding any research
and development costs incurred in designing and
implementing, upgrading, or altering the product, but
including amortized capital costs for the preparation and
distribution of the parts; and
(c) The price charged by other manufacturers for
similar parts or products;
(5) "Independent repair provider", an individual or
business operating in the state that is not affiliated with
a manufacturer or a manufacturer's authorized repair dealer
of a product and that is engaged in the diagnosis, service,
maintenance, or repair of a product. A manufacturer's
authorized repair dealer shall be considered an independent
repair provider if the repair dealer engages in the
diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of a product that
is not affiliated with the manufacturer;
(6) "Manufacturer", an individual or business that, in
the ordinary course of its business, is engaged in selling
or leasing new products to consumers or other end users and

SB 1564 3
is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair
of those products;
(7) "Owner", an individual or business that lawfully
acquires a product purchased or used in the state;
(8) "Product", any product regardless of the date
purchased. "Product" shall exclude motor vehicles;
(9) "Remote diagnostics", a remote data-transfer
function between certain products and a provider of repair
services, including for purposes of remote diagnostics,
settings controls, or location identification;
(10) "Service parts", replacement parts, either new or
used, made available by the manufacturer to the authorized
repair provider for the purposes of repair;
(11) "Trade secret", anything tangible or intangible
or electronically stored or kept that constitutes,
represents, evidences, or records intellectual property
including, but not limited to:
(a) Secret or confidentially held designs, processes,
procedures, formulas, inventions, or improvements;
(b) Secret or confidentially held scientific,
technical, merchandising, production, financial, business,
or management information; or
(c) Any trade secret as that term is defined under
paragraph (3) of 18 U.S.C. Section 1839.
407.653. 1. Owners of products purchased or used in
this state shall have the right to:
(1) Access the same diagnostic and repair information
of products manufactured by the manufacturer as the
manufacturer makes available to independent repair providers
or authorized repair providers. Such information shall be
provided in the same manner and time as provided to
authorized repair providers. Such information shall

SB 1564 4
include, but not be limited to, repair technical updates,
diagnostic software, service access passwords, updates and
corrections to firmware, and related documentation; and
(2) Purchase service parts available upon fair and
reasonable terms. Such service parts shall be made
available in the same manner and time as given to authorized
repair providers. Such service parts shall include updates
to firmware of parts.
Nothing in this section shall require the manufacturer to
sell service parts if the service parts are no longer
available to the manufacturer or the authorized repair
channel of the manufacturer.
2. An authorized repair provider shall have the right
to purchase diagnostic, service, or repair information in a
format standardized with other manufacturers instead of a
proprietary format from a manufacturer if the manufacturer
sells diagnostic, service, or repair information to
independent repair providers or third-party providers in
such a standardized format or if the manufacturer offers
terms and conditions more favorable to independent repair
providers or third-party providers than the manner and the
terms and conditions that are available to an authorized
repair provider. However, this subsection shall not apply
if the proprietary format includes diagnostic, service,
repair, or dealership operations information or
functionality not available in a standardized format.
3. Owners and independent repair providers shall have
the right to purchase from manufacturers of products sold or
used in this state all diagnostic repair tools,
incorporating the same diagnostic repair and remote
diagnostic capabilities that the manufacturer makes

SB 1564 5
available to its own repair or engineering staff or any
authorized repair providers, upon fair and reasonable terms.
4. Manufacturers that provide repair information to
aftermarket tools, diagnostics, or third-party service
information publications and systems have fully satisfied
their obligations under this section and thereafter are not
responsible for the content and functionality of aftermarket
diagnostic tools or service information systems.
5. Manufacturers of products sold or used in the state
for the purposes of providing security-related functions
shall not exclude diagnostic, service, or repair information
necessary to reset a security-related electronic function
from information provided to owners and independent repair
providers. If necessary for security purposes,
manufacturers may provide information necessary to reset and
unlock system or security-related electronic modules to
owners and independent repair providers through an
appropriate secure data release system.
6. Nothing in this section shall require the
manufacturer to divulge a trade secret.
7. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary,
this section shall not be read, interpreted, or construed to
abrogate, interfere with, contradict, or alter the terms of
an agreement executed between an authorized repair provider
and a manufacturer including, but not limited to, performing
warranty or recall repair work by an authorized repair
provider on behalf of a manufacturer pursuant to the
authorized repair agreement. Except in the case of a
dispute arising between a manufacturer and its authorized
repair provider related to either party's compliance with an
existing repair agreement, an authorized repair provider has
all the rights and remedies provided in this section.

SB 1564 6
8. This section shall not require manufacturers or
authorized repair providers to provide an owner or
independent repair provider access to nondiagnostic and
nonrepair information provided by a manufacturer to an
authorized repair provider pursuant to the terms of an
authorizing agreement.
9. (1) An independent repair provider or owner who
believes that a manufacturer has failed to provide
information, including documentation, updates to firmware,
safety and security corrections, diagnostics, documentation,
or a tool required by this section, shall notify the
manufacturer in writing and give the manufacturer thirty
days from the time the manufacturer receives the complaint
to cure the failure. If the manufacturer cures the failure
within thirty days, damages are limited to actual damages in
any subsequent litigation.
(2) If the manufacturer fails to respond to the notice
provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection or if an
independent repair provider or owner is not satisfied with
the manufacturer's cure, the independent repair provider or
owner may file a complaint in circuit court. The complaint
shall include:
(a) Written information confirming that the
complainant attempted to acquire and use, through the then
available standard support function provided by the
manufacturer, all relevant diagnostics, tools, service
parts, documentation, and updates to embedded software,
including communication with customer assistance via the
100 manufacturer's then standard process, if made available by
101 the manufacturer; and
102 (b) Evidence of manufacturer notification as required
103 in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

SB 1564 7
104 10. No manufacturer shall be required to provide any
105 information or service parts under subsection 1 of this
106 section if the product for which the information or service
107 parts are sought is under a valid warranty for repair or
108 replacement of the product.
109 11. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions
110 of this section. Each violation of this section shall be
111 punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars, which shall be
112 deposited into the school fund of the county in which the
113 complaint arose.
114 12. This section shall not apply to manufacturers or
115 distributors of a medical device as defined in the Federal
116 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or a digital electronic
117 product or software manufactured for use in a medical
118 setting including diagnostic, monitoring, or control
119 equipment or any product or service that the manufacturer or
120 distributor of a medical device offers.
121 13. This section shall not apply to a manufacturer,
122 dealer, distributor, integrator, installer, or monitoring
123 service provider of a central station security device or
124 alarm system, including, but not limited to, all central
125 station alarm systems used to prevent, detect, protect
126 against, or respond to fire, carbon monoxide risks, falls,
127 medical alerts, or security incidents, or control access to
128 residential, commercial, and governmental property,
129 services, or information systems.
✓